California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) California farm sales, which are of vital importance to California agriculture and the state’s economy, have been adversely affected by increasing foreign imports and a loss of export markets as a result of numerous factors including, in some cases, unfair trade practices of foreign governments and foreign business enterprises.

(b) Under the Trade Act of 1974 (19 U.S.C. Sec. 2101 et seq.), an interested party may file a petition with the United States Trade Representative to negotiate for a remedy when any act, policy, or practice of a foreign government is inconsistent with international trade agreements, or otherwise unreasonable, unjustifiable, or discriminatory and is a burden or is restrictive to United States commerce, or if a foreign government fails to grant United States rights under a trade agreement.

(c) Agricultural parties at interest under the act are encountering difficulties in obtaining these remedies. They are encountering a lengthy, costly, political process which requires extensive factfinding to show significant interest and substantial damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1358, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

It is the intent of the Legislature to support the multilateral and bilateral free and fair trade negotiation process currently in place, but to provide California agricultural parties at interest with additional support through state involvement and unified statistical data compilation and analysis to contribute to a more effective and persuasive presentation of cases brought by California agricultural interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1358, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

The department may, upon the request of a California agricultural interest which is pursuing a case under Section 301 or 302 of the Trade Act of 1974, gather and provide analytical assistance, information, and data in support of the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1358, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

704.

The director shall establish a reasonable schedule of fees to cover the amount expended for providing analytical assistance, information, and data requested by the California agricultural interest pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1358, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

705.

All state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Finance and the Employment Development Department shall cooperate with the director in the compilation of pertinent statistical data and shall respond to requests by the director for information in a timely manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 225, Sec. 12.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. State Agricultural Policy [801. - 822.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [801. - 803.]

801.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Thurman Agricultural Policy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1150, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

802.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Agriculture is the number one industry in California, which is the leading agricultural state in the country.

(b) Although California’s cultivated land accounts for approximately 3 percent of the country’s entire supply of farmland, the state has historically produced about 10 percent of the farm cash receipts in the United States.

(c) California leads the nation in the production of approximately 50 different crops and livestock products.

(d) The diversity of the state’s agriculture is truly impressive, for over 250 different commodities are grown here.

(e) Family owned farms produce most of the food and fiber produced by the California agricultural industry.

(f) The economic strength of the California’s agricultural industry depends on farmers and ranchers being able to profitably market the commodities and products raised.

(g) A profitable and healthy farming industry must be sustained by a sound natural resource base of soils, water, and air which is developed, conserved, and maintained to ensure sufficient quantities and the highest optimum quality possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

The Legislature further finds and declares that, regardless of the findings in Section 802, this state does not presently have a formal agricultural policy. That policy should guide decisionmaking by the Legislature so that the needs of the agricultural industry can be considered for the benefit of the residents of this state, each of whom is directly and indirectly affected by California agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1150, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Agricultural Policy [821. - 822.]

821.

As part of promoting and protecting the agricultural industry of the state and for the protection of public health, safety, and welfare, the Legislature shall provide for a continuing sound and healthy agriculture in California and shall encourage a productive and profitable agriculture. Major principles of the state’s agricultural policy shall be all of the following:

(a) To increase the sale of crops and livestock products produced by farmers, ranchers, and processors of food and fiber in this state.

(b) To enhance the potential for domestic and international marketing of California agricultural products through fostering the creation of value additions to commodities and the development of new consumer products.

(c) To sustain the long-term productivity of the state’s farms by conserving and protecting the soil, water, and air, which are agriculture’s basic resources.

(d) To maximize the ability of farmers, ranchers, and processors to learn about and adopt practices that will best enable them to achieve the policies stated in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 670, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

822.

The Legislature shall review actions taken in the implementation and furtherance of the state agricultural policy for their impact on the following factors:

(a) Productive agricultural land.

(b) Agricultural water supplies.

(c) Agricultural energy resources, including, but not limited to, energy rates and rate structures.

(d) Pest control, exclusion, detection, and eradication activities.

(e) Agricultural labor.

(f) Agricultural production tools, including, but not limited to, fertilizers and implements of husbandry.

(g) Marketing agricultural products in the domestic and foreign markets.

(h) Agricultural research, education, and agricultural extension programs.

(i) Agricultural transportation and distribution systems.

(j) Agricultural financing.

(k) Family owned farms.

(l) Activities of county agricultural commissioners.

(m) Agricultural exhibits at state-supported fairs.

(n) Recycling agricultural byproducts.

(o) Applied new technologies including, but not limited to, new food product and value-added product development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 152, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Agriculture Theft Prevention [851. - 885.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [851. - 851.]

851.

It is the intent of this chapter to establish a means of identifying the owner of any fruits, nuts, or vegetables which are the food product of any tree, vine, or plant so as to provide an additional control over thefts of these commodities within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 661, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Proof of Ownership [861. - 866.]

861.

For lots of over 25 pounds of any fruits, nuts, or vegetables that are the food product of any tree, vine, or plant, or for lots of over 200 pounds of any burl wood from a walnut tree, living or dead, and that are marketed for commercial purposes, all of the following apply:

(a) Every person who sells the commodity for resale, processing, or further distribution through any commercial or nonprofit enterprise shall provide the buyer or transporter with a record of proof of ownership for each lot of the commodity.

(b) Every person who buys the commodity for resale, processing, or further distribution through any commercial or nonprofit enterprise shall obtain from the previous buyer or from the transporter a record of proof of ownership for each lot of the commodity.

(c) Every person who transports for commercial purposes shall possess a record showing proof of ownership for each lot of the commodity during transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   (AB 905)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

862.

Upon probable cause to believe any fruits, nuts, vegetables, or walnut burl regulated pursuant to this chapter is in unlawful possession, proof of ownership shall be made available for inspection upon request of the secretary, the commissioner, or by any peace officer. If the secretary or the commissioner has probable cause to believe that any fruits, nuts, vegetables, or walnut burl regulated pursuant to this chapter is in unlawful possession, he or she may request a peace officer to stop the vehicle pursuant to Section 881 for inspection. The record shall contain the following information:

(a) Name, address, telephone number, and signatures of the seller or the seller’s authorized representative.

(b) Name, address, and telephone number of the buyer or consignee if not sold.

(c) Common or generic name and quantity of the commodity involved.

(d) Date of transaction and date of commencement of transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 238, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

863.

A bill of lading, bill of sale, certified farmers certificate, data obtainable by electronic transmission which is accessible to a common carrier, or a similar type document shall be considered proof of ownership for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 661, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

864.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly falsify or cause to be falsified any information in a record intended to show proof of ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 661, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

865.

A copy of the record shall be retained by the buyer and seller for a period of 60 days after delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 661, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

866.

This chapter establishes minimal requirements for the transportation and identification of agricultural commodities. A county may, by ordinance, impose additional requirements regarding this transportation and identification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 661, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions [871. - 871.]

871.

This chapter does not apply to the following agricultural commodities:

(a) Commodities transported from the farm or ranch where they are produced to a commercial packing plant within this state for processing or packing.

(b) Commodities transported and accompanied by a valid permit, disposal order, or certificate issued by the director or the commissioner for any reason other than to comply with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 661, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement [881. - 885.]

881.

Any peace officer, upon probable cause to believe an agricultural commodity regulated pursuant to this chapter is being unlawfully transported, may stop the vehicle and request proof of ownership of the commodity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 661, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

882.

Upon reasonable belief that a person is in unlawful possession of a commodity regulated by this chapter, the commodity may be held or seized by the secretary, the commissioner, or any peace officer and shall be turned over to the custody of the commissioner. The commissioner may hold the commodity on the premises where it was seized or may take possession of the commodity and maintain custody until disposed of according to the requirements of Section 884.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 487, Sec. 2.   (AB 905)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

883.

The director, the commissioner, or a peace officer may investigate to ascertain the ownership of any commodity that has been held pursuant to this chapter. If the lawful owner is located, the commodity shall be released to the owner, or his or her agent. The commissioner may require reasonable payment to cover costs incurred in the storing of the commodity, but not to exceed the value of the commodity being held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 661, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

884.

(a) If for any reason the commodity is not released to the rightful owner after being in the custody of the commissioner for 48 hours or, in the case of a highly perishable commodity, any shorter period of time that the commissioner deems necessary, the commissioner may either sell the commodity by public auction or by private sale at fair market value to a commercial packer of the commodity, or, after 72 hours from the time of seizure, may donate the commodity to a nonprofit charitable organization. If donated, the commodity shall not be sold by the receiving party. If sold, all of the proceeds derived from the sale of the commodity shall be held by the commissioner for a period of not less than six months, during which time the lawful owner of the commodity may submit satisfactory proof of ownership and obtain possession of the proceeds. The commissioner may require the payment by the owner of an amount sufficient to cover the costs incurred for a storage and sale of the commodity, but not to exceed the sale price of the commodity. If, after retention of the proceeds for a period of at least six months, no demand is made or if proof of ownership is not supplied, the commissioner shall deposit the proceeds of the sale of the commodity in the general fund of the county.

(b) If the commodity is unfit for human consumption, the commissioner may destroy it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 946, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

885.

In lieu of civil prosecution, the secretary or the commissioner may levy a civil penalty against any person violating the provisions of this chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant to its provisions. The civil penalty for each violation shall be, for a first violation, a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). For a second or subsequent violation, the fine shall be not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Before a civil penalty is levied, the person charged with the violation shall receive notice of the nature of the violation and shall be given an opportunity to be heard. This shall include the right to review the evidence and a right to present evidence on his or her own behalf. Subdivision (e) of Section 43003 shall apply to any fine levied pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. False, Deceptive, or Misleading Marketing [890. - 894.]

890.

(a) It is unlawful for any person or entity, or employee or agent of that person or entity, to make any statement, representation, or assertion orally, by public statement, advertisement, signage, or by any means that relates to the sale or availability of agricultural products that is false, deceptive, or misleading regarding any of the following:

(1) The area of production of the agricultural product.

(2) The identity of the producer of the agricultural product.

(3) The manner and method of production of the agricultural product.

(b) A violation of the provisions of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

891.

In lieu of prosecution, the secretary, or a county agricultural commissioner under the authority of the secretary, may levy a civil penalty against a person or entity that violates this chapter in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The amount of the penalty assessed for each violation shall be based upon the scope of the violation, the seriousness of the deception, and the impact of the penalty on the violator, including the deterrent effect on future violations. Subdivision (e) of Section 43003 shall apply to a fine or civil penalty levied pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

892.

Any action taken against a person by the secretary or a county agricultural commissioner pursuant to Section 890 or 891 shall not preclude the secretary or a county agricultural commissioner from taking a separate action for a violation of a provision of this code that is specific to a particular license or permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

893.

(a) All civil penalties collected pursuant to this chapter by the secretary shall be deposited in the Direct Agricultural Marketing Penalty Account, which is hereby created in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, and shall be used to conduct investigations and enforcement actions upon complaints filed or pursuant to information received that results in the investigation of a violation of Section 890. Money deposited pursuant to this chapter also may be used to contract with county agricultural commissioners for services that further the purposes of this chapter, and may be used for expenses incurred by county agricultural commissioners for investigative and enforcement actions conducted pursuant to this chapter.
 Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys deposited pursuant to this chapter shall be continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal year for purposes of this chapter.

(b) All civil penalties collected pursuant to enforcement actions by a county agricultural commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

894.

An action brought by the state or a county pursuant to Section 891 or 892 for a violation of Section 890 shall preclude a concurrent proceeding by the state or a county for the same act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   (AB 1871)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. THE STATE BOARD OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURE [901. - 954.]



  CHAPTER 1. Organization [901. - 906.]

901.

There is in the state government the State Board of Food and Agriculture which consists of 15 members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------

901.5.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that representatives of the agricultural industry appointed to the State Board of Food and Agriculture pursuant to this chapter are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such board, the particular industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1429.)
-------------------------------------------

902.

The members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor as follows:

(a) One from the Agricultural Sciences Division of the University of California.

(b) One from the agricultural department of one of the state universities and colleges offering agriculture as a part of the curriculum.

(c) Two members shall be appointed from the state at large who represent the agricultural industry.

(d) Seven members, not more than one of whom shall be appointed from any one congressional district or from any one county, who represent the agricultural industry.

(e) Two members of the public who have no direct financial interest in the production or handling of agricultural products, but who have an interest in, and knowledge of, the environment.

(f) Two members of the public who have no direct financial interest in the production or handling of agricultural products, but who have an interest in, and knowledge of, consumer affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------

903.

The term of office of the members of the board is four years. The terms expire on January 15 of each year in the rotation which is presently established. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. On February 1 of each year the Governor shall designate one of the members of the board to serve as president. The term of office of the members appointed pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 902 shall commence on January 15, 1976.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------

904.

The members shall be residents and citizens of the state and shall be specially qualified for this service through actual farm business, economic agricultural training, environmental protection, or consumer affairs. Each member of the board representing the agricultural industry shall have a major interest in a separate branch of the agricultural industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------

905.

The members shall serve without pay, but shall be allowed necessary traveling and incidental expenses which are incurred in the discharge of their duties. The expenses shall be paid from the appropriation for the support of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

906.

(a) Public officers associated with any area of government, including agriculture, and whether elected or appointed, may be appointed to, and may serve contemporaneously as members of, the board.

(b) No member of the board appointed pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 902 shall participate in any board action that involves himself or herself or any agricultural entity with which he or she is connected as a director, officer, or employee, or in which he or she has a financial interest in the decision within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (AB 219)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Powers and Duties [951. - 954.]

951.

The board shall inquire into the needs of the agricultural industry of this state and the functions of the department in relation to such needs, and confer and advise with the Governor and the director as to how the agricultural industry and the consumer of agricultural products may best be served by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------

951.5.

The board shall make recommendations to the secretary regarding the project agreements to be funded pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 58551) of Part 1 of Division 21.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

952.

The board, and any member of it who is authorized by resolution of the board, may make investigations, conduct hearings, and prosecute actions concerning all matters and subjects which are under the jurisdiction of the department. For such purposes, the board and its authorized members shall have all of the powers and authority which are conferred upon a head of a state department by Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

953.

The board shall hold meetings at least once a month in the office of the director at Sacramento or at any other location determined by the president of the board to be appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 325.)
-------------------------------------------

954.

Special or adjourned meetings may be held at the office of the director in Sacramento, or at any other place in the state which the president may deem necessary. Special meetings of the board shall also be called by the president at any time upon the written request of four members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 325.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. CALIFORNIA AGRICULTURE DAY [1500. - 1501.]

1500.

The first day of spring in each year is hereby designated as California Agriculture Day.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 348, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.

Notwithstanding the Education Code, including, but not limited to, provisions relating to curriculum requirements, on the first day of spring or on another day determined by public schools throughout the state, these schools are encouraged to provide education that instructs students on the history and importance of agriculture in California. This instruction may include education on agricultural history, nutrition, economics, or the planting of a school garden ; or the use of any educational device that commemorates agriculture’s importance in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 348, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. LOCAL ADMINISTRATION [2001. - 2350.]



CHAPTER 1. County Department of Agriculture [2001. - 2003.]

2001.

There is in each county government the county department of agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2002.

The county department of agriculture is under the control of the county agricultural commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2003.

The California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association shall be recognized as the official representative body on behalf of county agricultural commissioners and sealers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. County Agricultural Commissioners and Their Employees [2101. - 2287.]



  ARTICLE 1. Qualifications [2101. - 2107.]

2101.

(a) The director shall examine persons who desire to become commissioners or deputy commissioners. He or she may adopt regulations which govern the examinations. Successful candidates shall be given a license which shall be valid for five years unless revoked.

(b) The director may charge each candidate a fee to cover the actual cost of providing the license examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 6.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

(a) The director shall pass upon the qualifications of persons who desire to become county agricultural inspectors and shall issue licenses to successful candidates.

(b) The director may charge each candidate a fee to cover the actual cost of providing the license examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 7.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

The director shall issue a license, for any county which has a charter that provides for civil service examination of county agricultural inspectors, to any person who presents a certificate which shows that the person has passed the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 8.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

A commissioner, deputy commissioner, or county agricultural inspector need not be a resident of the county for which he may be chosen.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

Prior to entering upon his duties, the commissioner shall file the usual oath, and he shall be required to file an official bond in an amount determined by the board of supervisors, unless he is covered by a master bond pursuant to Section 1481 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

No person shall be eligible for the examination or shall be given or issued a license pursuant to Section 2101, 2102, or 2103 unless he or she possesses a bachelor’s degree from an accredited four-year college with specialization in one or more appropriate disciplines in the agricultural, biological, chemical, or physical sciences, or other appropriate disciplines, as determined by the secretary. If a person is registered as a senior in an accredited four-year college in one of the specializations described herein, that person shall be admitted to the examination, but a license shall not be issued until that person graduates. In determining whether or not a college is accredited, the secretary may rely on accreditation granted by a state or national association formed and operated for the purpose of determining accreditation. This section shall not apply to any person holding a valid license of qualification in weights and measures who was employed by a county agricultural commissioner or sealer in a permanent classification before January 1, 1995, and who possesses at least one license in an agricultural category no later than December 31, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 818, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

The director shall publish and make available a registry of persons holding a license pursuant to Section 2101, 2102, or 2103 and Section 12202 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 10.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appointment and Employment [2121. - 2129.]

2121.

The commissioner shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of the county. Any chartered county may, however, prescribe a different method of appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2122.

The term of office of the commissioner shall be four years from and after his appointment and until his successor is appointed. He may, however, be removed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2123.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person shall not be appointed to the office of commissioner or deputy commissioner unless he or she has a license issued by the director. The license of any qualified incumbent shall be renewed without further examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 11.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

2124.

If the board of supervisors of such adjoining county consents, the board of supervisors of any county in which there is no commissioner may employ a qualified commissioner or a qualified deputy commissioner of the adjoining county to perform the duties of commissioner in the employing county.

A commissioner or deputy commissioner who is so employed shall have such authority and powers as are conferred upon a commissioner by this code. He is not required to comply with residence or other qualifications for office within the employing county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2125.

In any county in which no commissioner has served, the director shall perform the duties of commissioner in the same manner, to the same extent, and with the same authority as if he had been the duly appointed commissioner in such county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

2126.

The commissioner may appoint deputy commissioners, inspectors, and clerks who shall serve at his pleasure.

Such inspectors may be designated as county agricultural inspectors or county agricultural biologists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 558.)
-------------------------------------------

2127.

Deputy commissioners and inspectors shall be appointed from a list which is furnished by the director of persons who hold a license for the office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 12.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

2128.

If the position of deputy commissioner cannot be filled from the list, a temporary appointment may be made for a period not exceeding six months upon the written recommendation of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2129.

If the position of inspector cannot be filled from the list, a temporary appointment not exceeding six months may be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Vacancies [2151. - 2154.]

2151.

If a vacancy in the office of commissioner occurs, the director, upon learning of the vacancy, shall immediately transmit to the board of supervisors or other appointing power a list of persons who are licensed by him or her to be eligible for the position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 13.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

2152.

If, within 60 days after the receipt of the list of persons who are licensed, the appointing power fails to appoint a commissioner from the list, the secretary shall appoint a commissioner from the list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2153.

If there is no qualified person available for the office of commissioner, the appointing power may make a temporary appointment, for a period not exceeding three months, of a person who is recommended in writing by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2154.

If the appointing power does not make a temporary appointment of a commissioner and no person can be appointed from the eligible list by the director, the director may make a temporary appointment of a person who is competent to carry on the duties of the office for a period not exceeding three months.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Removal [2181. - 2187.]

2181.

Upon satisfactory evidence presented to the Secretary or the Director of the Department of Pesticide Regulation that the commissioner of any county is guilty of neglect of duty, incompetence, or misconduct in office, the trial board that is selected, pursuant to this article, shall hold a hearing at the time and place specified by the trial board. The secretary shall convene the trial board when the alleged offenses come under the jurisdiction of the Department of Food and Agriculture, and the director shall convene the trial board when the alleged offenses come under the jurisdiction of the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2182.

The county agricultural commissioner’s trial board shall be composed of the Secretary and the Director of the Department of Pesticide Regulation, a person who has knowledge of, or experience in, agriculture, selected by the board of supervisors of the county of the charged commissioner, and a hearing officer from the Office of Administrative Hearings, who shall be chairman and a voting member of such board.

The department that convenes the trial board is responsible, under Section 11370.4 of the Government Code, for the cost of the services provided for by the Office of Administrative Hearings in carrying out the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 806, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2183.

At least 10 days prior to the date of the hearing the director shall give notice in writing to the commissioner of the time and place of the hearing and such information as to the nature of the charges as will enable the commissioner to present a defense to the charges.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2184.

At the hearing the trial board shall hear the evidence which is offered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2185.

The trial board shall, within 30 days subsequent to the conclusion of the hearing make an order dismissing the charges or an order disqualifying the commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2186.

If the order disqualifies the commissioner, the director shall revoke the commissioner’s license and declare his or her office vacant. A copy of the order shall be immediately transmitted by the director to the board of supervisors and the auditor of the county in which the commissioner held office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 15.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

2187.

The license of a deputy commissioner may be revoked in the same manner and for the same causes that a license of a commissioner may be revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 16.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Compensation [2201. - 2206.]

2201.

The compensation provided for a commissioner, deputy commissioner, county agricultural inspector, or clerk who is employed by the year or by the month shall be paid out of the county treasury in the same manner and at the same time as county officers are paid. A commissioner and each deputy commissioner or inspector is entitled to receive his traveling and incidental expenses which are necessarily incurred in the performance of his duty. Such expenses and all compensation which is earned by a commissioner, deputy commissioner, inspector, or clerk who is not employed by the year or by the month are a county charge. The board of supervisors shall allow and pay them in the same manner as other claims are allowed and paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

2203.
